Maryland, session 2026, HB0952.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 14–1330 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1330.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE 15–10B–05.1 OF
THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
(3) (I) “COMPANION CHATBOT” MEANS AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM WITH A NATURAL LANGUAGE INTERFACE THAT PROVIDES
ADAPTIVE, HUMAN–LIKE RESPONSES TO USER INPUTS AND IS CAPABLE OF MEETING
A USER’S SOCIAL NEEDS, INCLUDING BY EXHIBITING ANTHROPOMORPHIC
FEATURES AND BEING ABLE TO SUSTAIN A RELATIONSHIP ACROSS MULTIPLE
INTERACTIONS.
(II) “COMPANION CHATBOT” DOES NOT INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 952 3
1. A BOT THAT IS USED BY A BUSINESS ENTITY ONLY FOR
CUSTOMER SERVICE, TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE, BUSINESS ANALYTICS, OR INTERNAL
RESEARCH;
2. A BOT THAT:
A. IS A FEATURE OF A VIDEO GAME, SERVICE, SYSTEM,
OR APPLICATION THAT IS NOT A COMPANION CHATBOT;
B. IS LIMITED TO REPLIES RELATED TO THE VIDEO
GAME, SERVICE, SYSTEM, OR APPLICATION; AND
C. DOES NOT SHARE CONTENT RELATED TO MENTAL
HEALTH, SELF–HARM, SUICIDAL IDEATION, SUICIDE, OR SEXUALLY EXPLICIT
CONDUCT; OR
3. A BOT THAT IS DESIGNED FOR BUSINESS
PRODUCTIVITY OR INTERNAL BUSINESS USE; OR
4. A CONSUMER ELECTRONIC DEVICE THAT:
A. FUNCTIONS AS A SPEAKER AND A VOICE COMMAND
INTERFACE;
B. ACTS AS A VOICE–ACTIVATED VIRTUAL ASSISTANT;
C. DOES NOT SUSTAIN A RELATIONSHIP ACROSS
MULTIPLE INTERACTIONS; AND
D. DOES NOT GENERATE OUTPUTS THAT ARE LIKELY TO
ELICIT EMOTIONAL RESPONSES FROM THE USER.
(4) “DE–IDENTIFIED DATA” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–4401
OF THIS TITLE.
(4) (5) “MINOR USER” MEANS A USER OF A COMPANION CHATBOT
THAT AN OPERATOR KNOWS OR REASONABLY SHOULD KNOW IS A MINOR.
(5) (6) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF SUICIDE PREVENTION IN
THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.
(6) (7) “OPERATOR” MEANS A PERSON WHO MAKES A COMPANION
CHATBOT AVAILABLE TO A USER IN THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 952
(8) (I) “PERSONAL DATA” MEANS ANY INFORMATION THAT IS
LINKED OR CAN BE REASONABLY LINKED TO AN IDENTIFIED OR IDENTIFIABLE
CONSUMER.
(II) “PERSONAL DATA” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. DE–IDENTIFIED DATA; OR
2. PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION.
(7) (9) “SEXUALLY EXPLICIT CONDUCT” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN 18 U.S.C. § 2256.
(8) (10) “VIDEO GAME” MEANS A GAME PLAYED ON AN ELECTRONIC
DEVICE THAT:
(I) UTILIZES A COMPUTER, A MICROPROCESSOR, OR SIMILAR
ELECTRONIC CIRCUITRY AND A MONITOR, OR THAT IS DESIGNED TO BE PLAYED
USING A TELEVISION OR A COMPUTER MONITOR; AND
(II) INTERACTS WITH THE INDIVIDUAL PLAYING THE GAME,
INCLUDING THROUGH A CHATBOT.
(B) (1) AN OPERATOR SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A PROTOCOL
FOR PREVENTING A COMPANION CHATBOT FROM PRODUCING OR PRESENTING
CONTENT CONCERNING SELF–HARM, SUICIDAL IDEATION, OR SUICIDE TO A USER
WHO EXPRESSES THOUGHTS OF SELF–HARM OR SUICIDAL IDEATION TO THE
COMPANION CHATBOT.
(2) THE PROTOCOL REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE A NOTIFICATION TO A USER WHO EXPRESSES
THOUGHTS OF SELF–HARM OR SUICIDAL IDEATION THAT REFERS THE USER TO A
CRISIS SERVICE PROVIDER, INCLUDING:
(I) THE MARYLAND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CRISIS RESPONSE
SYSTEM; AND
(II) THE NATIONAL 9–8–8 SUICIDE AND CRISIS LIFELINE.
(3) AN OPERATOR SHALL USE EVIDENCE–BASED METHODS FOR
DETECTING WHEN A USER IS EXPRESSING THOUGHTS OF SELF–HARM OR SUICIDAL
IDEATION TO A COMPANION CHATBOT.

HOUSE BILL 952 5
(4) AN OPERATOR SHALL PUBLISH THE PROTOCOL REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON THE OPERATOR’S WEBSITE.
(C) (1) AN OPERATOR SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A PROTOCOL
FOR PREVENTING A COMPANION CHATBOT FROM PRODUCING OR PRESENTING TO A
MINOR USER CONTENT CONCERNING SEXUALLY EXPLICIT CONDUCT, INCLUDING:
(I) VISUAL DEPICTIONS OF SEXUALLY EXPLICIT CONDUCT; AND
(II) CONTENT SUGGESTING THAT THE MINOR USER SHOULD
ENGAGE IN SEXUALLY EXPLICIT CONDUCT.
(2) AN OPERATOR SHALL PUBLISH THE PROTOCOL REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON THE OPERATOR’S WEBSITE.
(D) AN OPERATOR SHALL DISPLAY A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS WARNING
TO A USER STATING THAT COMPANION CHATBOTS:
(1) ARE ARTIFICIALLY GENERATED AND NOT HUMAN; AND
(2) MAY NOT BE SUITABLE FOR SOME MINORS.
(E) AN OPERATOR SHALL DISPLAY TO A MINOR USER A CLEAR AND
CONSPICUOUS WARNING AFTER 3 HOURS OF CONSECUTIVE USE, AND EVERY 3
HOURS THEREAFTER:
(1) STATING THAT COMPANION CHATBOTS ARE ARTIFICIALLY
GENERATED AND NOT HUMAN; AND
(2) RECOMMENDING THAT THE USER TAKE A BREAK FROM USING THE
COMPANION CHATBOT.
(E) A DEVELOPER SHALL ESTABLISH AND PROVIDE TO A USER OF THE
OPERATOR’S CHATBOT CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS WARNINGS THAT THE CHATBOT IS
ARTIFICIALLY GENERATED AND NOT HUMAN THROUGH THE USE OF BOTH:
(1) A STATIC, PERSISTENT WARNING THAT CONTINUOUSLY APPEARS
ON THE SCREEN; AND
(2) A DYNAMIC WARNING THAT POPS UP ON THE SCREEN AND
REQUIRES A USER TO RESPOND:
(I) AT THE START OF THE USER’S INTERACTION WITH THE
CHATBOT;

HOUSE BILL 952
(II) AFTER EVERY HOUR OF THE USER’S CONTINUOUS
INTERACTION WITH THE CHATBOT; AND
(III) WHEN PROMPTED BY THE USER IN A MANNER THAT
QUESTIONS HOW THE CHATBOT FUNCTIONS OR PROVIDES RESPONSES.
(F) (1) A CONTROLLER SHALL LIMIT THE COLLECTION OF PERSONAL
DATA TO WHAT IS REASONABLY NECESSARY AND PROPORTIONATE TO SATISFY THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A CONTROLLER MAY NOT USE DATA REGARDING EMOTIONAL
STATE OR MENTAL HEALTH VULNERABILITIES TO TAILOR ALGORITHMS TO
INCREASE THE DURATION OR FREQUENCY OF USE OF A CHATBOT.
(G) (1) A CONTROLLER SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A COMPLAINT
SYSTEM THAT ENABLES A USER TO REPORT CONTENT PRODUCED OR PRESENTED BY
A CHATBOT THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION.
(2) WITHIN 3 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER A COMPLAINT IS FILED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE CONTROLLER SHALL:
(I) REVIEW THE CONTENT REPORTED;
(II) TAKE ALL REASONABLE STEPS TO:
1. REMOVE ANY CONTENT THAT VIOLATES THIS
SECTION; AND
2. PREVENT ANY FURTHER PRESENTATION OR
PRODUCTION OF THE CONTENT IN A MANNER THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION; AND
(III) REPORT THE COMPLAINT AND THE RESULTS OF THE
REVIEW TO THE OFFICE.
(F) (H) (1) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027,
AN OPERATOR SHALL REPORT TO THE OFFICE:
(I) INFORMATION ON THE PROTOCOLS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) THE NUMBER OF TIMES THE OPERATOR HAS ISSUED A
NOTIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 952 7
(III) DETAILS ABOUT THE METHODS USED UNDER SUBSECTION
(B)(3) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(IV) ALL COMPLAINTS FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING THE RESULTS OF THE REVIEW OF EACH COMPLAINT AND ANY
FOLLOW–UP ACTIONS TAKEN.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY NOT CONTAIN ANY PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION ABOUT
A USER.
(3) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
OFFICE SHALL:
(I) COMPILE DATA FROM THE REPORTS SUBMITTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
CALENDAR YEAR; AND
(II) PUBLISH THE DATA ON THE OFFICE’S WEBSITE.
(G) (I) (1) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) (I) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE
WITHIN THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) (II) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY
PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE, EXCEPT § 13–411 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE REMEDIES CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS
ARTICLE, A CHATBOT SHALL BE CONSIDERED A PRODUCT FOR WHICH:
1. AN OPERATOR AND A DEVELOPER HAVE AN AFFIRMATIVE
DUTY TO ENSURE DOES NOT INJURE OR HARM A USER;
2. AN OPERATOR OR A DEVELOPER MAY BE HELD STRICTLY
LIABLE FOR CAUSING INJURY OR HARM TO A USER; AND
3. AN INDIVIDUAL MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR A DESIGN
DEFECT, A MANUFACTURING DEFECT, OR A MARKETING DEFECT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.